Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202586-1610
Telecommunications company; discontinue service; applicability of law.

A telecommunications company seeking to discontinue service in a deregulated exchange shall be exempt from subdivision (1)(a) of section 86-134. A telecommunications company seeking to discontinue service in a deregulated exchange shall be solely subject to subdivision (1)(b) of section 86-134.

Laws 2025, LB311, § 10.